District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “STEER Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 8(d) of Strengthening Traffic Enforcement, Education, and Responsibility
(“STEER”) Amendment Act of 2024, effective April 20, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-161; 71 DCR 2248), is
amended to read as follows:
“(d)(1) Section 3 shall apply:
“(A) With respect to the Ignition Interlock Device established by section 10a
of the District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, effective April 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-238; D.C.
Official Code § 50-2201.05a), as of January 1, 2027; and
“(B) For all other purposes, including the Intelligent Speed Assistance
Program established by section 10a-1 of the District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, effective April
20, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-161; D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.05a-1), as of the effective date of the
STEER Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2026, passed on emergency basis on February
3, 2026 (Enrolled version of B26-583).
“(2) Sections 4(d) and (f), 5, and 6 shall apply as of January 1, 2027.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective Date.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2